Massachusetts, session 194th, H3577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following section:
Section 29. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
fund to be known as the Zero Carbon Renovation Fund that shall be administered by the
Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs, in consultation with the Department of
Energy Resources, the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology Center, the Governor’s Office
of Climate Innovation and Resilience, the Executive Office of Housing and Livable
Communities, the Massachusetts School Building Authority, the Executive Office of Economic
Development, the Massachusetts Housing Partnership Fund Board, and the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency, who shall expend the funds for costs associated with the
renovation of existing buildings including Affordable housing as defined by section 38D of
chapter 121B, homes rented or owned by low or moderate income households as defined by
of 3

section 38D of chapter 121B, municipal buildings, including, but not limited to, public schools,
and small businesses with Massachusetts State Supplier Diversity Office Certifications to
conduct “Zero Carbon Renovations'' so that these buildings shall, to the maximum extent
practicable: (i) be highly energy efficient; (ii) use all-electric heating, hot water, and cooking
technologies; (iii) include on-site renewable energy generating sources; and (iv) be renovated
with low-embodied carbon materials. Funds may also be expended as necessary for costs
associated with the remediation of existing building conditions which must be addressed before a
Zero Carbon Renovation can be completed. Such remediations may include but not be limited to
mitigation of mold, asbestos, insect and animal infestation, lead paint, electric system upgrades
to meet current code or facilitate building electrification, accessibility upgrades required for
compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, and remediation of any structural issues
related to accommodating the Zero Carbon Renovation. Said fund shall be available to buildings
throughout the Commonwealth, while prioritizing Affordable housing and low or moderate
income homes, public schools, and other buildings located in: (i) environmental justice
communities, as defined in section 62 of chapter 30 and (ii) gateway cities, provided, however,
that monies deposited in said fund shall, to the maximum extent feasible, be allocated and spent
through existing programs supporting the aforementioned decarbonization activities. (There shall
be credited to the fund all amounts that are transferred, or authorized to be transferred thereto, or
directed to be deposited therein, and all amounts received as gifts, grants, or contributions for the
purposes of the fund. Any money remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not
revert to the General Fund, but shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.
XXXX-XXXX For a reserve, as established in Section 29 of Chapter 21A of the General
Laws, to support the renovation of existing buildings including affordable housing; homes of low
of 3

or moderate income households; municipal buildings, including, but not limited to, public
schools; and small businesses with Massachusetts State Supplier Diversity Office Certifications,
provided, however, that funds in this item shall be administered by the Executive Office of
Energy and Environmental Affairs, in consultation with the Department of Energy Resources,
the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology Center, the Governor’s Office of Climate
Innovation and Resilience, the Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities, the
Massachusetts School Building Authority, the Executive Office of Economic Development, the
Massachusetts Housing Partnership Fund Board, and the Massachusetts Development Finance
Agency, for Zero Carbon Renovations; provided further that not less than $300,000,000 shall be
transferred to the Zero Carbon Renovation Fund …………$300,000,000
of 3